District of Columbia statutes.
43-126

Penalty.

Any person who shall violate or aid and abet in violating any of the provisions of § 43-120 shall, upon conviction thereof by competent judicial authority, be punished, for each offense, by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1298, ch. 854, § 684
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34,§ 29(c)(3), 28 DCR 3271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-126.
1973 Ed., § 27-126.